05_Project/frc.twol
Alphabet

A À Â Æ B C Ç D E É È Ê Ë F G H I Ï Î J K L M N O Ô Œ P Q R S T U Ù Û Ü V W X Y Ÿ Z
a à â æ b c ç d e é è ê ë f g h i ï î j k l m n o ô œ p q r s t u ù û ü v w x y ÿ z '
%>
;
Sets

V = A À Â Æ E É È Ê Ë I Ï Î O Ô Œ U Ù Û Ü Y Ÿ
	a à â æ e é è ê ë i ï î o ô œ u ù û ü y ÿ;

C = B C Ç D F G H J K L M N P Q R S T V W X Z
	b c ç d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v w x z;

AssimS = S s X x;

AE = a e A E;
AO = a o A O;

EExclusions = e n E N;

IrregularPlurals = S s X x u U;

Rules

"Remove morpheme boundary"
%>:0 <=> _ ;

"No double -e"
%{e%}:0 <=> e: %>: _ ;

"Feminine forms of words ending in -n"
%{e%}:ne <=> n: %>: _ ;

"Adjectives ending in -er"
e:è <=> _ r: %>: %{e%}: ;

"Feminine ending voicing"
f:v <=> _ %>: %{e%}: ;

"Default -e affix"
%{e%}:e <=> %>: _ ;
	except EExclusions: %>: _ ;

"Plurals of words ending in -s or -x"
%{s%}:0 <=> AssimS: _ #;

"Plurals of words ending in -au or -eu"
%{s%}:x <=> AE: u: _ #;

"Normal plurals"
%{s%}:s <=> _ # ;
	except IrregularPlurals: _ #;

"Normal plurals ending in -u"
%{s%}:s <=> u _ #;
	except AE: u: _ #;
	
"Spelling alterations to preserve G pronunciation"
g:ge <=> n: _ %>: a: ;

"C softening"
c:ç <=> _ %>: AO: ;
